Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
TOBACCO PRODUCTS AND INHALANT DELIVERY SYSTEMS
SECTION 1. Section 2 of  this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 167.750 to
167.785.
SECTION 2. The prohibitions provided in ORS 471.430 (3) and 475B.316 (2) do not apply
to a person who is under 21 years of age and who is acting under the direction  of the Oregon
Health Authority, the  Oregon Liquor Control Commission, a local public health authority as
defined in ORS 431.003, a city or a state or local  law enforcement agency for the purpose of
investigating possible violations of federal, state or local laws that prohibit the sale  of to-
bacco products or inhalant delivery systems to persons under 21 years of age.
SECTION 3.  ORS 167.760 is amended to read:
167.760. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person under 21  years of age
may not purchase or attempt to purchase tobacco products or an inhalant delivery system.
(2) A person  under 21 years of age who is acting under the supervision of a person 21 years of
age or older may [ purchase or attempt to purchase tobacco products or an inhalant delivery  system ],
for the purpose  of testing compliance with a federal [ law, state law, ], state or  local law or retailer
policy limiting or regulating the distribution or sale of tobacco products or inhalant  delivery sys-
tems to persons who are under the legal minimum purchase age[ .]:
(a) Purchase or  attempt to purchase tobacco products or an inhalant delivery system;
and
(b) Enter or attempt to enter an  establishment, or portion of an establishment, where
tobacco products or inhalant delivery systems are sold and that is posted  or otherwise
identified as being prohibited to the entry of persons under 21 years of age.
SECTION 4. (1) Section 2 of  this 2021 Act and the amendments to ORS 167.760 by section
3 of this 2021 Act become operative on January 1, 2022.
Enrolled Senate Bill 64 (SB 64-A) Page 1
(2) The Oregon Health  Authority, the Oregon Liquor Control Commission and a local
public health authority may take any action before the operative date specified in subsection
(1) of this section that is necessary  to enable the commission, the Oregon Health Authority
and a local public  health authority to exercise, on and after the operative date specified in
subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and powers conferred  on the com-
mission, the Oregon Health Authority  and a local public health authority by section 2 of this
2021 Act and the amendments to ORS 167.760 by section 3 of this 2021 Act.
LEAD-BASED PAINT
SECTION 5.  ORS 431A.358 is amended to read:
431A.358. (1) An individual may not perform or  offer to perform[ , for compensation, ] lead-based
paint activities unless the individual is certified as provided under ORS 431A.355 [ or is performing
lead-based paint activities under the supervision of a person certified under ORS 431A.355 ].
(2) A firm may not perform[ ,] or offer to perform[ , lead-based paint activities or ] a renovation for
compensation unless the firm is  certified as provided under ORS 431A.355 [ or is performing lead-
based paint activities or renovation under the supervision of a person certified under ORS 431A.355 ].
(3) A firm may not  perform or offer to perform lead-based paint activities unless the firm
is certified as provided under ORS 431A.355.
SECTION 6. (1) The amendments to ORS 431A.358 by section  5 of this 2021 Act become
operative on January 1, 2022.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority may take  any action before the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of this  section that enables the authority to exercise, on and after the op-
erative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and powers
conferred on the authority by the amendments to ORS 431A.358 by section 5  of this 2021 Act.
PRESCRIPTION MONITORING PROGRAM
SECTION 7.  ORS 431A.880 is amended to read:
431A.880. (1) As used in this section, “board” means:
(a) The Oregon Medical Board;
(b) The Oregon Board of Dentistry;
(c) The Oregon Board of Naturopathic Medicine;
(d) The Oregon State Board of Nursing;
(e) The Oregon Board of Optometry; and
(f) The State Board of Pharmacy.
(2)(a) At the  time of issuing or renewing a license, a board shall provide the Oregon Health
Authority with the licensing information of each person licensed by the board who is authorized  to
prescribe or dispense controlled substances. The authority shall use the licensing  information to
qualify the licensee to report information to, or receive  information from, the prescription monitor-
ing program established under ORS 431A.855.
(b) A board  by rule may adopt exceptions to the requirement described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection.
(3)(a) In addition to  other licensing fees imposed by a board on licensees, a board shall adopt
rules imposing a fee of  $25 per year on each person licensed by the board who is authorized to
prescribe or dispense controlled substances. A board shall  collect the fee at the same time the board
collects other licensing fees imposed on licensees.
(b) A board shall retain 10  percent of the fees collected under paragraph (a) of this subsection
to cover the costs of administering this section.
(c) On the first day  of each calendar quarter, a board shall transmit 90 percent of the fees col-
lected under paragraph (a) of this subsection during the preceding calendar quarter to the [ Elec-
tronic Prescription Monitoring  Fund established in ORS 431A.885 ] Oregon Health Authority Fund
Enrolled Senate Bill 64 (SB 64-A) Page 2
established in ORS 413.101. Moneys deposited in the fund under this paragraph may  be used
only for the purpose of carrying out ORS 431A.855 to 431A.900.
(4) A board may adopt rules necessary for the administration of this section.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 413.101 is amended to read:
413.101. (1) The  Oregon Health Authority Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Oregon Health Authority Fund  shall be
credited to the fund.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section,  moneys in the fund are continuously
appropriated to the Oregon Health Authority for carrying out the duties, functions  and powers of
the authority under ORS 413.032 and 431A.183.
(3)(a) Moneys deposited in the fund pursuant to ORS 431A.880  are continuously appro-
priated to the authority for the purpose of carrying out ORS 431A.855 to 431A.900.
(b) The authority may accept grants,  donations, gifts or moneys from any source for the
purposes of carrying out ORS 431A.855 to 431A.900. Moneys received under this paragraph
shall be deposited into the fund  and are continuously appropriated for the purposes of car-
rying out ORS 431A.855 to 431A.900.
(c) Moneys subject  to a federal restriction or other funding source restriction must be
accounted for separately from other moneys described in this subsection.
SECTION 9.
ORS 431A.885 is repealed.
SECTION 10. (1) The amendments to ORS 413.101 and 431A.880 by sections 7 and 8  of this
2021 Act and the repeal  of ORS 431A.885 by section 9 of this 2021 Act become operative on
January 1, 2022.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority may take  any action before the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of this section that is  necessary to enable the authority to exercise, on and
after the operative date specified  in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions
and powers conferred on the authority by the amendments to ORS 413.101 and  431A.880 by
sections 7 and 8 of this 2021 Act and the repeal of ORS 431A.885 by section 9  of this 2021 Act.
LOCAL PUBLIC HEALTH REGULATION
SECTION 11.  ORS 433.006 is amended to read:
433.006. (1) Except as provided in subsection  (2) of this section,  in response to each report
of a reportable disease, the local public health administrator shall [ assure] ensure that investi-
gations and control measures, as prescribed by  Oregon Health Authority rule, [ shall be ] are con-
ducted.
(2) If there has been a transfer  of responsibility from a local public health authority to
the Oregon Health Authority under ORS  431.382, the Oregon Health Authority shall ensure
that investigations and control measures are conducted, as funding allows, pursuant to  rules
adopted by the Oregon Health Authority.
SECTION 12.  ORS 433.080 is amended to read:
433.080. When the Oregon Health Authority  declares by rule that mandatory testing of source
persons could help a defined  class of workers from being infected or infecting others with the human
immunodeficiency virus, the following apply:
(1) When a source person, after having been  first requested to consent to testing by rules
adopted under ORS 433.065, has refused or within a time period prescribed by rule of the authority
has failed to submit to the requested test,  except when the exposed person has knowledge that the
exposed person has a history of a positive HIV test, the exposed person may  seek mandatory testing
of the source person by  filing a petition with the circuit court for the county in which the exposure
occurred. The form for the petition shall be as  prescribed by the authority and shall be obtained
from the local public health department or the Oregon Health Authority if there has been a
transfer of responsibility under ORS 431.382 .
Enrolled Senate Bill 64 (SB 64-A) Page 3
(2) The petition shall name the source person as the respondent and shall  include a short and
plain statement of facts alleging:
(a) The petitioner is a worker subjected to an occupational exposure or a person who has been
subjected to a substantial exposure by a worker administering health care and  the respondent is the
source person;
(b) The petitioner is in the class of workers defined by rule of the authority under this  section;
(c) All procedures for obtaining  the respondent’s consent to an HIV test by rules adopted under
ORS 433.065 have been exhausted by the petitioner  and the respondent has refused to consent to the
test, or within the time period prescribed by rule of the authority has failed to submit to the test;
(d) The petitioner has no knowledge  that the petitioner has a history of a positive HIV test and
has since the exposure, within  a time period prescribed by rule of the authority, submitted a speci-
men from the petitioner for an HIV test; and
(e) The  injury that petitioner is suffering or will suffer if the source person is not ordered to
submit to an HIV test.
(3) The petition shall be accompanied by the certificate of the local public  health administrator
or State Health Officer if there has been a transfer of responsibility under  ORS 431.382  de-
claring that, based upon information in the possession of the administrator, the facts stated in  the
allegations under subsection (2)(a), (b) and (c) of this section are true.
(4) Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall issue a citation to the respondent  stating the
nature of the proceedings, the statutes involved and the relief requested  and, that if the respondent
does not appear at the time  and place for hearing stated in the citation, that the court will order
the relief requested in the petition.
(5) The citation shall be served on the respondent together with  a copy of the petition by the
county sheriff or deputy. The person  serving the citation and petition shall, immediately after ser-
vice thereof, make a return showing the time, place and manner of  such service and file it with the
clerk of the court.
(6) The hearing shall be held within three days of the service of the citation  upon the respond-
ent. The court may for good cause allow an additional period of 48 hours  if additional time is re-
quested by the respondent.
(7) Both the petitioner and the local public health  administrator or State Health Officer if
there has been a transfer of  responsibility under ORS 431.382  certifying to the matter alleged
in the petition shall appear at the hearing. The hearing of the case shall  be informal with the object
of resolving the issue before the court  promptly and economically between the parties. The parties
shall be  entitled to subpoena witnesses, to offer evidence and to cross-examine. The judge may ex-
amine witnesses to insure a full inquiry into the facts necessary for a determination of the matter
before the court.
(8) After hearing all of the evidence, the court shall determine the  truth of the allegations
contained in the petition. The court shall  order the respondent to submit to the requested test by
a licensed health  care provider without delay if, based upon clear and convincing evidence, the
court finds that:
(a) The allegations in the petition are true;
(b) The  injury the petitioner is suffering or will suffer is an injury that only the relief requested
will adequately remedy; and
(c) The interest of the petitioner in obtaining  the relief clearly outweighs the privacy interest
of the respondent in withholding consent.
(9) If the court does not make the finding described in subsection (8) of this section, the  court
shall dismiss the petition.
(10) Failure to obey the order of the court shall be subject to contempt proceedings pursuant
to law.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 452.010 is amended to read:
452.010. As used in this section and ORS 452.020 to 452.300, unless the context requires other-
wise:
Enrolled Senate Bill 64 (SB 64-A) Page 4
(1) “County court” includes board of county commissioners.
(2) “District” means a vector control district established for the  prevention, control or
eradication of public health vectors and predatory animals.
[(3) “Health officer” means a local public health administrator as defined in ORS 431.003. ]
[(4)] (3) “Integrated pest management methods” means  the processes described in ORS 634.650
(1).
(4) “Local public health administrator” has the meaning given that term in ORS 431.003.
(5) “Pesticide use plan” means an annual plan created by a vector  control district or a county
court that describes anticipated pesticide use.
(6) “Predatory animals” has the meaning given that term in ORS 610.002.
(7) “Public health vectors” means arthropods and vertebrates of public health significance  and
those insects included within the  family Chironomidae of the order Diptera. The term does not in-
clude any domesticated animal.
(8) “Vector habitat” means any area where public health vectors are found.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 452.080 is amended to read:
452.080. (1) After an order is entered forming a district, the county court of the county  in which
the district is situated shall [ forthwith] appoint a governing board of  five trustees . [each of whom
shall] Each trustee appointed under this subsection must  be a resident and elector of the dis-
trict.
[(2) The trustees shall  hold office for four years and until their successors are appointed and
qualified, except that for each new board of  five trustees one member shall be appointed for a term of
one year, one for a term of two  years, one for a term of three years and two for a term of four
years.]
(2)(a) Except as  provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the term of office of a
trustee is four years, and a trustee shall serve in office until a successor is appointed.
(b) For each new board of trustees established, trustees shall be appointed as follows:
(A) One trustee for a one-year term;
(B) One trustee for a two-year term;
(C) One trustee for a three-year term; and
(D) Two trustees for a four-year term.
(3) Each trustee shall  take an oath to faithfully perform the duties of office. The oath shall be
filed with the county clerk.
(4) The board of trustees shall elect a president, a secretary and a  treasurer at the first meeting
of each calendar year. Officers shall serve for one calendar year.
(5) All [ health officers ] local public health administrators or their designees with offices in
the district shall be ex  officio members of the board of trustees  without vote and shall be offered
the opportunity to assist in the creation of district plans.
(6) The board of trustees may compensate a trustee in an amount not exceeding $100  per year
for attendance at conferences that provide training and education to  carry out trustee duties under
ORS 452.110.
(7) The board of trustees may adopt a resolution to change the name of  the district. The board
shall file a copy  of a resolution changing the name of the district with the Secretary of State and
the county  clerk within 10 days after adopting the resolution. Following a name change, the district
name must contain the words:
(a) Vector control district;
(b) Mosquito and vector control district;
(c) Mosquito control district; or
(d) Vector and predatory animal control district.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 452.120 is amended to read:
452.120. The county court shall:
Enrolled Senate Bill 64 (SB 64-A) Page 5
(1) Call special meetings of the board of trustees  of the district for the purposes of  investi-
gation and supervision of [ its] the district’s  affairs. At least one meeting shall be called annually
for the purpose of reviewing the activities of the district.
(2) Hold hearings of complaints of other interested persons.
(3) Require the board to furnish by February 1  of each year a proposed annual work program
which shall include an estimate of funds required for the  next year and a description of the work
contemplated and the methods to be employed by the district.
(4) Approve, after consultation with the [ health officers ] local public health administrators or
their designees, the annual work program of the district before any work contracts or  operations
are entered into by the board.
(5) Require the board to furnish by February 1 of  each year an annual report covering moneys
expended, methods employed and work accomplished during the past fiscal year.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 452.160 is amended to read:
452.160. (1)(a) In addition to  or in lieu of the tax levy provided for by ORS 452.153, the board
of trustees of any district may, at the times and in the manner provided by law for public  corpo-
rations, furnish  to the county court and county accountant an estimate and statement, made pursu-
ant to the budget laws of the state, of the amount of money necessary for all  purposes required
under ORS 452.020 to 452.170 during the next ensuing fiscal year.
(b) Subject to  paragraph (c) of this subsection,  the county court may include the amount of
the estimate [ so] made under paragraph (a) of this subsection , or any  portion [ thereof] of the
estimate, in the annual budget of the county.
(c) [ However, in no one year shall the amount  be greater than enough to raise the amount ] The
amount described in paragraph (b) of this subsection may not, in any one year, be greater
than enough to raise the amount  determined by the board of trustees  under paragraph (a) of
this subsection,  and approved by the county  court and the [ health officers ] local public health
administrators or  their designees on the board. The amount budgeted, when added to any taxes
levied under ORS 452.153, shall  not exceed two-tenths of one percent (0.002) of the real market value
of all taxable property within the district, computed in accordance with ORS 308.207.
(2) The county court, thereafter at the time and in the manner of levying taxes for state  and
county purposes, may  levy a tax on all the taxable property in the district sufficient to raise the
amount of the estimate made by the board of trustees of the district.
(3) All taxes levied under this  section shall be computed and entered on the assessment and tax
rolls of the county and collected at the same time and in the same manner as state and county taxes.
When collected, the taxes shall be paid into the county treasury for the  use of the district. Such
funds may be withdrawn only upon warrants issued by the proper authorities of the district.
SECTION 17.
(1) The amendments to ORS 433.006,  433.080, 452.010, 452.080, 452.120 and
452.160 by sections 11 to 16 of this 2021 Act become operative on January 1, 2022.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority  and a local public health authority may take any action
before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable
the Oregon Health  Authority and the local public health authority to exercise, on and after
the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all  of the duties, functions and
powers conferred on the Oregon Health Authority and the  local public health authority by
the amendments to ORS 433.006,  433.080, 452.010, 452.080, 452.120 and 452.160 by sections 11
to 16 of this 2021 Act.
SCHOOL-BASED HEALTH SERVICES
SECTION 18.
 Section 1, chapter 601, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  (1) The Oregon Health Authority, in  consultation with the Department of Education,
shall select 10 school districts or education service districts to receive  planning grants for district
planning and technical  assistance. Each district receiving a grant, beginning on or after July 1,
2019, and concluding before July 1, 2021, shall:
Enrolled Senate Bill 64 (SB 64-A) Page 6
(a) Evaluate the need for school-based health services in their respective communities; and
(b) Develop a plan that  addresses the need identified in paragraph (a) of this subsection by
drafting a proposal for a  school-based health center as defined in ORS 413.225 or by designing a
pilot program as described in subsection (5)(b) of this  section to test an alternative approach to
providing school-based health services.
(2) Each grantee shall consult with a nonprofit organization with  experience in organizing
community projects, or a local organization that coordinates  with a statewide nonprofit organiza-
tion, to facilitate the planning process and to provide technical assistance.
(3) Each grantee  shall solicit community participation in the planning process, including the
participation of the local public health authority, any federally qualified health centers  located in
the district, a regional health equity coalition, if any, serving the district and every coordinated care
organization with members residing in the district.
(4) The Oregon Health Authority may contract with a statewide nonprofit organization with
experience in supporting school-based health centers to create tools  and provide support to grantees
during the community engagement and planning process.
(5) At the conclusion of the two-year planning process[ :]
[(a) The authority shall select at least six school-based health center medical sponsors to  each re-
ceive operating funds based on a school-based health center  funding formula, to ], the authority shall
select up to 10 entities in respective grantee school  districts or education service districts
to receive operating funds to either:
(a) Open  a state-certified school-based health center [ in respective grantee school districts or ed-
ucation service districts. ], based on a school-based health center funding formula; or
(b) [ Contingent upon available  funds, the authority may select up to four school districts or edu-
cation service districts to each receive operating funds, for a five-year period, to ] Pilot , for  a five-year
period, an approach to providing  school-based health services as an alternative model to the
school-based health center model. The alternative approach pilot programs may be  designed to focus
services on a specific community need, such as a need  for mental health services, school nursing
services, dental services, primary care or trauma-informed services, and may:
(A) Involve a partnership with  a coordinated care organization, a federally qualified health
center, a local public health authority or another major medical sponsor; and
(B) Identify a  process for billing insurance, medical assistance or another third-party payer, or
identify other funding, for the cost of services.
(6) By the end of the fourth  year of the five-year period described in subsection (5)(b) of this
section:
(a) Each school district or education service district piloting an alternative approach to  pro-
viding school-based health  services either commits to establish a school-based health center or pro-
poses an alternative model to the authority and the Legislative Assembly.
(b) The authority may use the data collected and the recommendations of the  school districts
to adopt rules establishing flexible, outcome-based criteria for  certification of the alternative ap-
proaches developed and implemented by the [ four] grantees piloting alternative models under
subsection (5)(b) of this section .
(7) As used in this section, “regional health equity coalition” means a coalition that:
(a) Is independent of coordinated  care organizations and government agencies, community-led,
cross-sector and focused on addressing rural and urban health inequities  for communities of color,
Oregon’s federally recognized Indian tribes, immigrants, refugees, migrant and seasonal  farm work-
ers, low-income populations, persons with disabilities and persons who  are lesbian, gay, bisexual,
transgender or questioning, with communities of color as the priority;
(b) May include as member organizations a federally recognized Indian tribe,  a culturally spe-
cific organization, a social service provider, a health care  organization, a public health research
organization, a behavioral health organization, a private foundation or a faith-based organization;
(c) Develops governance structures that include members of communities  impacted by health
inequities;
Enrolled Senate Bill 64 (SB 64-A) Page 7
(d) Has a decision-making body on which more  than half of the persons are self-identified per-
sons of color and more than half of the persons experience health inequities;
(e) Prioritizes selection  of organizational representatives who are self-identified persons of color
or have a role related to health equity;
(f) Operates on a model that honors community wisdom by promoting solutions that build  on
community strengths and recognizes the impact of structural, institutional  and interpersonal racism
on the health and well-being of communities of color; and
(g) Focuses on:
(A) Meaningful community engagement;
(B) Coalition building, developing a governance structure for the  coalition and creating operat-
ing systems for the daily and long term functioning of the coalition  led by individuals with demon-
strated leadership and expertise in promoting and improving health equity;
(C) Building capacity and leadership among coalition members,  staff and decision-making bodies
to address health equity and the social determinants of health; and
(D) Developing and advocating for policy, system and environmental changes to improve  health
equity in this state.
HEALTH LICENSING OFFICE
SECTION 19.
 Section 23, chapter 456, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 23.  The amendments to ORS [ 676.150,] 676.560, 676.565, 676.579, [ 676.590, 676.595,] 676.608,
676.612, 676.613 and 676.622 by sections [ 13 to 22 of this 2019 Act ] 14 to 16 and 19 to 22, chapter
456, Oregon Laws 2019,  apply to complaints and reports received on or after  [ the operative date
specified in section 24 of this 2019 Act ] January 1, 2020.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 20. The unit captions  used in this 2021 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2021 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 21. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled Senate Bill 64 (SB 64-A) Page 8
Passed by Senate March 11, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House May 26, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 64 (SB 64-A) Page 9